test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-oho_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/aANlyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - ôhô - ok : # -m animate noun, owl
     ôhôw+N+AN+Sg: ôhôw
     ôhôw+N+AN+Pl: ôhôwak
     ôhôw+N+AN+Loc: ôhônâhk
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: ôhôsis
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: ôhôsisak
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: ôhôsisihk

     ôhôw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitôhôm
     ôhôw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitôhôm
     ôhôw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otôhôma
     ôhôw+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg+Obv: otôhômiyiwa
     ôhôw+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitôhôminân
     ôhôw+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitôhôminaw
     ôhôw+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitôhômiwâw
     ôhôw+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otôhômiwâwa
     ôhôw+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl+Obv: otôhômiyiwa

     ôhôw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitôhômak
     ôhôw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitôhômak
     ôhôw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otôhôma
     ôhôw+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg+Obv: otôhômiyiwa
     ôhôw+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitôhôminânak
     ôhôw+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitôhôminawak
     ôhôw+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitôhômiwâwak
     ôhôw+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otôhômiwâwa
     ôhôw+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl+Obv: otôhômiyiwa

     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitôhôsis
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitôhôsis
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otôhôsisa
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg+Obv: otôhôsisiyiwa
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitôhôsisinân
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitôhôsisinaw
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitôhôsisiwâw
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otôhôsisiwâwa
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl+Obv: otôhôsisiyiwa

     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitôhôsisak
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitôhôsisak
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otôhôsisa
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg+Obv: otôhôsisiyiwa
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitôhôsisinânak
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitôhôsisinawak
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitôhôsisiwâwak
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otôhôsisiwâwa
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl+Obv: otôhôsisiyiwa

     ôhôw+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitôhômihk
     ôhôw+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitôhômihk
     ôhôw+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otôhômihk
     ôhôw+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: otôhômiyihk
     ôhôw+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitôhôminânihk
     ôhôw+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitôhôminâhk
     ôhôw+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitôhômiwâwihk
     ôhôw+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otôhômiwâwihk 
     ôhôw+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: otôhômiyihk

     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitôhôsisihk
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitôhôsisihk
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otôhôsisihk
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: otôhôsisiyihk
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitôhôsisinânihk
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitôhôsisinâhk
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitôhôsisiwâwihk
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otôhôsisiwâwihk
     ôhôw+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: otôhôsisiyihk
